sl-SI: Zaustavitev plovnosti bojlija: Plavajoče; Nevtralno plovno; Toneče; Počasi toneče; Drugo
pl: Wyporność stopera do kulek proteinowych: Pływające; O neutralnej wyporności; Tonące; Wolno tonące; Inne
es: Flotabilidad del tope para boilie: Flotante; Flotabilidad neutra; Hundimiento; Hundimiento lento; Otro
ru: Плавучесть стопора для бойлов: Плавающий; Нейтральная плавучесть; Тонущий; Медленно тонущий; Другое
ja: ボイリーストップの浮力: フローティング; 中性浮力; シンキング; スローシンキング; その他
fi: Boilie-stopparin kelluvuus: Kelluva; Neutraali noste; Uppoava; Hitaasti uppoava; Muu
hr-HR: Zaustavljanje plovnosti boile: Plutajuće; Neutralna plovnost; Tonuće; Sporotonuće; Ostalo
da: Flydeevne for boilie-stop: Flydende; Neutral opdrift; Synkende; Langsomt synkende; Andet
ro-RO: Flotabilitate opritor boilie: Plutitor; Flotabilitate neutră; Scufundător; Scufundare lentă; Altele
pt-BR: Flutuabilidade da trava da boilie: Flutuante; Flutuação neutra; Afunda; Afundamento lento; Outros
it: arresto di galleggiamento della boilie: Galleggiante; Galleggiabilità neutra; Affondante; Ad affondamento lento; Altro
fr: Flottabilité du stop pour bouillettes: Flottant; Flottabilité neutre; Coulant; Coulant lent; Autre
zh-CN: 丸饵挡豆浮力: 浮水; 中性浮力; 沉水; 缓沉; 其他
vi: Độ nổi của nút chặn mồi câu: Nổi; Nổi trung tính; Chìm; Chìm chậm; Khác
bg-BG: Плавателност на стопера за бойли: Плаващ; Неутрална плаваемост; Потъващ; Бавно потъващ; Друго
ko: 보일리 스톱 부력: 플로팅; 중성 부력; 싱킹; 슬로우 싱킹; 기타
pt-PT: Flutuabilidade do bloqueio de boilie: Flutuante; Flutuabilidade neutra; Afundante; Afundamento lento; Outro
lt-LT: Boilio stabdiklio plūdrumas: Plūduriuojantis; Neutralus plūdrumas; Skęstantis; Lėtai skęstantis; Kitas
en: Boilie stop buoyancy: Floating; Neutral buoyancy; Sinking; Slow sinking; Other
nl: Boilie stop drijfvermogen: Drijvend; Neutraal drijfvermogen; Zinkend; Langzaam zinkend; Overige
tr: Boilie stoper yüzebilirliği: Yüzen; Nötr yüzdürme; Batan; Yavaş batan; Diğer
sk-SK: Vztlaku zarážky návnady: Plávajúce; S neutrálnym vztlakom; Potápavé; Pomaly potápavé; Iné
nb: Boilie-stopp oppdrift: Flytende; Nøytral oppdrift; Synkende; Saktesynkende; Annet
hu: Bojlistopper felhajtóereje: Lebegő; Semleges felhajtóerő; Süllyedő; Lassan süllyedő; Egyéb
zh-TW: 波麗餌擋珠浮力: 浮水; 中性浮力; 沉水; 緩沉; 其他
el: Άνωση του boilie stop: Επιπλέει; Ουδέτερη πλευστότητα; Βυθίζεται; Βυθίζεται αργά; Άλλο
th: การลอยตัวของตัวหยุดเหยื่อแบบโบอีลี่: ลอยน้ำ; ลอยตัวเป็นกลาง; จมน้ำ; จมช้า; อื่นๆ
de: Auftrieb des Boiliestoppers: Schwimmend; Neutraler Auftrieb; Sinkend; Langsam sinkend; Sonstige
sv: Boilie-stoppets flytkraft: Flytande; Neutral flytkraft; Sjunkande; Långsamt sjunkande; Annan
cs: Vztlak zarážky na boilies: Plovoucí; Neutrálně vyvážené; Potápivé; Pomalu potápivé; Jiné